District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.15

Repealed

Nonparentage as defense.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 314, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 315, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(15), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-343.14.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.14

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Former § 46-303.15 has been recodified as § 46-303.16 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(16).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 315 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).